Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-790
Certificate of veterinary inspection; required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to bring, cause to be brought, or aid in bringing into this state any animal which is not accompanied by a certificate of veterinary inspection as required by section 54-788.

Laws 1975, LB 321, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 160, § 5.